District of Columbia statutes.
32-901

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Employee” means any natural person who performs any labor for compensation, in whole or in part, in the District of Columbia; but does not include:

(A)

Employees of any authority of the government of the United States other than the District of Columbia government;

(B)

Employees of any foreign government; or

(C)

Employees of any international organization defined in 22 U.S.C. § 288.

(2)

“Employer” means anyone who employs any natural person and who does business in the District of Columbia, but does not include any agency or authority of the federal government.

(3)

“Hiring procedure” means any procedure or action in the District of Columbia used to find, or to select for employment, any person seeking employment, whether the procedure is used by a prospective employer with all persons seeking employment, or is used only selectively with such persons.

(4)

“Lie detector test” means any polygraph, lie detector, or other test which by any mechanical, electrical, chemical, or physiological means attempts to determine whether a person is telling the truth, or the truth to the best of the person’s knowledge.

History

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-154, § 2, 25 DCR 6980

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-801.
1973 Ed., § 36-901.